Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2225
Highway Cash Fund; warrants.

The Director of Administrative Services shall draw his warrants upon the Highway Cash Fund for, but never in excess of, the amount herein appropriated upon presentation of proper vouchers. The State Treasurer shall pay such warrants out of the Highway Cash Fund.

Laws 1969, c. 314, § 3, p. 1132.